Utah statutes.
31A-26-212.   Emergency license.
In the event of a catastrophe or emergency which arises out of a disaster, act
of God, riot, civil commotion, conflagration, or other similar occurrence, the
commissioner shall, upon application, issue emergency licenses to persons who
are not licensed adjusters.  An emergency license shall be applied for within
a week of beginning claims adjustment.  It may remain in force for not more
than 90 days, unless extended by the commissioner before it expires for an
additional period of not more than 90 additional days.  The insurer who
contracts with an independent adjuster who is so licensed is responsible for
all his claims practices while so engaged, as if he were a regular salaried
employee.  The fee for an emergency license is the same as the fee required of
other licensed adjusters, unless the commissioner waives the fee.
